California statutes. Business and Professions Code
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 5.3. Delivery and Claims [19265. - 19265.]

19265.

A claim against a household mover for loss or damage of goods shall not be denied solely because the lost or damaged goods were not noted at the time of delivery. Whenever a household mover requires a signed statement acknowledging delivery and receipt of goods, the statement shall not include any representation that the goods were delivered in satisfactory condition, but shall include a
 notice that the shipper may file a claim with the household mover for lost or damaged goods.

(History: Added by Stats. 2017, Ch. 421, Sec. 8.   (SB 19)   Effective January 1, 2018.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 5.4. Subhauling Agreements [19266. - 19266.2.]

19266.

A household mover shall not transport household goods under a subhauling agreement unless each of the following occurs:

(a) The subhauler is permitted by the bureau to transport household goods and complies with the requirements of this chapter.

(b) The
 household mover and subhauler are jointly and severally liable for any loss or damage caused by the subhauler.

(History: Added by Stats. 2017, Ch. 421, Sec. 8.   (SB 19)   Effective January 1, 2018.)
-------------------------------------------

19266.1.

The bureau shall adopt any rules and regulations it determines to be necessary to enforce the requirements of this article.

(History: Added by Stats. 2017, Ch. 421, Sec. 8.   (SB 19)   Effective January 1, 2018.)
-------------------------------------------

19266.2.

This article does not apply to a subhauling agreement when the subhauler is not otherwise subject to this chapter for activity related to the subhauling agreement.

(History: Added by Stats. 2017, Ch. 421, Sec. 8.   (SB 19)   Effective January 1, 2018.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 5.5. Estimates [19267. - 19267.]

19267.

The bureau shall establish rules and regulations controlling the estimates given by a household mover to a shipper of the charges the household mover would make to perform services covered by this chapter. All household movers
 shall observe those rules and regulations and the failure to do so is unlawful. The bureau shall make such rules and regulations as are necessary to the application and enforcement of rules and regulations established pursuant to this section.

(History: Added by Stats. 2017, Ch. 421, Sec. 8.   (SB 19)   Effective January 1, 2018.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 6. Proceedings [19268. - 19270.]

19268.

(a) Except as otherwise provided in this chapter, all proceedings under this chapter to deny, suspend, amend, revoke, or place on probation a permit shall be conducted pursuant to Chapter 5 (commencing with Section 11500) of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code.

(b) A citation or fine assessment issued pursuant to a citation shall inform the household mover that, if he or she desires a
 hearing to contest a finding of a violation, the hearing shall be requested by written notice to the bureau within 30 days of the date of issuance of the citation or assessment. If a hearing is not requested pursuant to this section, payment of any fine shall not constitute an admission of the violation charged. Hearings shall be held pursuant to Chapter 5 (commencing with Section 11500) of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code.

(History: Added by Stats. 2017, Ch. 421, Sec. 8.   (SB 19)   Effective January 1, 2018.)
-------------------------------------------

19269.

Whenever the bureau determines that any household mover or any officer, director, or agent of any household mover is failing or omitting, or about to fail or omit, to do anything required of it by law, or by any order, decision, rule, regulation, direction, or requirement administered by the bureau, or is doing anything or about to do anything, or permitting anything or
 about to permit anything to be done, in violation of law or of any order, decision, rule, regulation, direction, or requirement administered by the bureau, the bureau may request the Attorney General or any district attorney, county counsel, city attorney, or city prosecutor in this state to make an application to the superior court in and for the county, or city and county, in which the cause or some part of the cause arose, or in which the corporation complained of has its principal place of business, or in which the person complained of resides for the purpose of having the violations or threatened violations stopped and prevented, either by mandamus or injunction, including, but not limited to, an order allowing vehicles used for subsequent operations subject to the order to be impounded at the
 household mover’s expense and subject to release only by subsequent court order following a petition to the court by the defendant or owner of the vehicle. Any action or proceeding brought pursuant to this section by the Attorney General, or a district attorney, county counsel, city attorney, or city prosecutor, as applicable, shall be brought in the name of the people of the State of California, by petition to the superior court, alleging the violation or threatened violation complained of and praying for appropriate relief by way of mandamus or injunction.

(History: Added by Stats. 2017, Ch. 421, Sec. 8.   (SB 19)   Effective January 1, 2018.)
-------------------------------------------

19269.1.

(a) Whenever the bureau determines that any household mover or any officer, director, or agent of any household mover has abandoned, or is abandoning, stored household goods or property of any shippers under contract with the
 household mover or movers, it may request the Attorney General or any district attorney, county counsel, city attorney, or city prosecutor in this state to commence a proceeding in superior court for the purpose of having the court appoint either a receiver or bureau staff to identify the stored items of property, to take possession of the property, and to arrange the return of the property to its owners in accordance with the orders of the court and with regard for the protection of all property rights involved.

(b) The proceeding shall be brought in the superior court in and for the county, or city and county, in which the cause or some part of the cause arose, or in which the person or corporation complained of has its principal place of business, or in which the person complained of resides. The
 proceeding shall be commenced in the name of the people of the State of California, by petition to the superior court, alleging the facts and circumstances involved and praying for appropriate relief by way of mandamus or injunction, or the appointment of a receiver, and authorizing the bureau to arrange for the hiring of a receiver who shall be required to comply with the requirements of Sections 566, 567, and 568 of the Code of Civil Procedure.

(c) The court may also appoint a receiver to manage the business of a household mover or movers and return property to its owner or owners upon a showing satisfactory to the court that the abandonment
 or threatened abandonment by the household mover jeopardizes property or funds of others in the custody or under the control of the household mover. The court may make any other order that it finds appropriate to protect and preserve those funds or that property.

(d) In the event a receiver is appointed by the court and the bureau is responsible for contracting for a receiver to carry out the duties authorized by this section, the bureau may contract on an emergency basis with a qualified person
 or corporation to serve as receiver under the conditions and guidelines set by the court. The contract for the receiver services may be executed by the bureau on an expedited basis. The receiver shall be paid from the fees collected pursuant to this chapter.

(History: Added by Stats. 2017, Ch. 421, Sec. 8.   (SB 19)   Effective January 1, 2018.)
-------------------------------------------

19270.

Upon the filing of such a petition, the court shall specify a time, not exceeding 20 days after the service of the copy of the petition, within which the household mover complained of shall answer the petition, and in the meantime the household mover may be restrained. In case of default in answer, or after answer, the court shall immediately inquire into the facts and circumstances of the case.
 Those corporations or persons that the court deems necessary or proper to be joined as parties, in order to make its judgment, order, or writ effective, may be joined as parties. The final judgment in any such action or proceeding shall either dismiss the action or proceeding or direct that the writ of mandamus or injunction issue or be made permanent as prayed for in the petition, or in such modified or other form as will afford appropriate relief.

(History: Added by Stats. 2017, Ch. 421, Sec. 8.   (SB 19)   Effective January 1, 2018.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 7. Suspension and Revocation of Permits [19271. - 19276.]

19271.

The bureau may, at the request of any household mover, suspend the operating permit of the household mover for a definite time during which it is unlawful for the household mover to conduct any operations as
 a household mover.

(History: Added by Stats. 2017, Ch. 421, Sec. 8.   (SB 19)   Effective January 1, 2018.)
-------------------------------------------

19272.

Upon the suspension of a permit, the bureau shall require the removal from any vehicle operated under the permit of any identifying symbols that have been placed on the vehicle.

(History: Added by Stats. 2017, Ch. 421, Sec. 8.   (SB 19)   Effective January 1, 2018.)
-------------------------------------------

19273.

Upon the termination of the period of suspension, the bureau shall restore the permit and the household mover shall again place on all vehicles the identifying symbols removed pursuant to the suspension.

(History: Added by Stats. 2017, Ch. 421, Sec. 8.   (SB 19)   Effective January 1, 2018.)
-------------------------------------------

19274.

A permit shall remain in effect until suspended or terminated as provided in this chapter. Any permit not exercised for a period of one year, inclusive of all periods of suspension, shall lapse and terminate.

A permit shall not be sold, leased, assigned, or otherwise transferred or encumbered by the holder of the permit without the holder first having secured from the bureau an order authorizing the transfer or encumbrance. The bureau shall not authorize any transfer or encumbrance of a permit except pursuant to a finding made by the bureau that the permit authorized to be transferred or encumbered has not lapsed or been terminated by nonexercise as provided in this section. Any sale, lease,
 assignment, or other transfer or encumbrance is void unless made in accordance with the order of the bureau authorizing it.

(History: Added by Stats. 2017, Ch. 421, Sec. 8.   (SB 19)   Effective January 1, 2018.)
-------------------------------------------

19274.1.

(a) The bureau shall only authorize a sale, lease, assignment, or other transfer of a permit to a transferee who has qualified in the manner provided by Section 19239.

(b) The bureau shall prescribe the procedure relative to:

(1) Assignment of permits.

(2) Transfer of permits between persons, where the transfer is effected through rent, lease, or sale of the business.

(3) Change in name, ownership, and address.

(History: Added by Stats. 2017, Ch. 421, Sec. 8.   (SB 19)   Effective January 1, 2018.)
-------------------------------------------

19275.

(a) The bureau may suspend the permit of any household mover after notice and an opportunity to be heard, if the household mover knowingly and willfully files a false report with the bureau.

(b) The bureau may amend or revoke, in whole or in part, the permit of any household
 mover, upon application of the permitholder, or may suspend, change, or revoke, in whole or in part, a permit, upon complaint or on the bureau’s own initiative, after notice and an opportunity to be heard, for providing false or misleading information on an application for a permit or for failure to comply with this chapter or with any order, rule, regulation, or tariff administered by the bureau, or with any term, condition, or limitation of the permit.

(c) As an alternative to the cancellation, revocation, or suspension of an operating permit or permits, the bureau may impose upon the holder of the permit or permits a fine of not more than thirty thousand dollars ($30,000). All fines collected shall be deposited into the
 fund.

(d) The bureau may cancel, suspend, or revoke the permit of any household mover upon the conviction of the household mover of any misdemeanor under this chapter while holding operating authority issued by the bureau, or the conviction of the household mover or any of its officers of a felony
 while holding operating authority issued by the bureau, limited to robbery, burglary, any form of theft, any form of fraud, extortion, embezzlement, money laundering, forgery, false statements, an attempt to commit any of the offenses described in this subdivision, aiding and abetting or conspiring to commit any of the offenses described in this subdivision, or intentional dishonesty for personal gain.

(e) (1) As used in this subdivision, “convicted of a prescribed felony” means a plea or verdict of guilty or a conviction following a plea of nolo contendere for any felony described in subdivision (d), or for an attempt to commit, aiding and abetting, or conspiring to commit any felony described in subdivision (d), that is committed in connection with, or arising from, a transaction for the transportation of used
 household goods or personal effects.

(2) If a household mover is convicted of a prescribed felony, the permit of the household mover may be revoked.

(3) If an officer, director, or managing agent of the household mover is convicted of a prescribed felony, the
 permit of the
 household mover may be suspended for a period of five years. If the bureau determines that the household mover did not have knowledge of, participate in, direct, aid and abet, authorize, or ratify the conduct of the person convicted and did not in any manner benefit from that conduct, the bureau may reinstate the permit on terms the bureau determines to be appropriate in the interest of justice and to ensure the protection of the public. The bureau may also extend the suspension or revoke the permit as provided in subdivision (d).

(4) If an officer, director, managing agent, or employee of the
 household mover is convicted of a prescribed felony, the person may not be an officer, director, managing agent, or employee of, or serve in any other capacity with, a household mover.

(5) It is a violation of this chapter for a household mover that knows or should know that a person has been convicted of a prescribed felony to hire, retain, or otherwise allow that person to serve as an officer, director, managing agent, or employee of, or in any other capacity
 with, the
 household mover.

(History: Added by Stats. 2017, Ch. 421, Sec. 8.   (SB 19)   Effective January 1, 2018.)
-------------------------------------------

19275.1.

(a) Upon receipt of a stop order issued by the Director of Industrial Relations pursuant to Section 3710.1 of the Labor Code, the bureau shall investigate to determine whether the household mover has filed a false statement relative to workers’ compensation insurance coverage, in violation of statute, or of rules or orders administered by the bureau. If, after notice and an opportunity to be heard, the bureau determines that there has been a violation of statute, or of rules or orders administered by the bureau, the bureau shall impose
 appropriate penalties, which may include a fine and suspension of operating authority for a violation.

(b) Upon receipt of a complaint from the Director of Industrial Relations that a final judgment has been entered against any household mover as a result of an award having been made to an employee pursuant to Section 3716.2 of the Labor Code, the bureau shall, 30 days from the date the household mover is mailed the notice, initiate action to revoke the
 household mover’s permit unless the judgment has been satisfied or has been discharged in accordance with the bankruptcy laws of the United States.

(c) Within seven days of receipt of a complaint from the Director of Industrial Relations that a final judgment has been entered against any household mover as a result of an award having been made to an employee pursuant to Section 3716.2 of the Labor Code, the bureau shall furnish the household mover
 named in the final judgment written notice of the right to a hearing regarding the complaint and the procedure to follow to request a hearing. The notice shall state that the bureau is required to initiate revocation proceedings pursuant to subdivision (b) unless the household mover provides proof that the judgment is satisfied or has been discharged in accordance with the bankruptcy laws of the United States. The notice shall also inform the household mover of a right to a hearing and the procedures to follow to request a hearing.
 Proceedings under this section shall be conducted pursuant to Chapter 5 (commencing with Section 11500) of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code. If the bureau finds that an unsatisfied judgment exists concerning a debt arising under Section 3717 of the Labor Code, the bureau shall immediately revoke the household mover’s permit.

(History: Added by Stats. 2017, Ch. 421, Sec. 8.   (SB 19)   Effective January 1, 2018.)
-------------------------------------------

19275.2.

(a) (1) Upon receipt of a written recommendation from the Department of the California Highway Patrol that the permit of a household mover be suspended for any of the following, the bureau, pending a hearing in the matter pursuant to subdivision (d), shall initiate proceedings to suspend the household mover’s permit:

(A) Failure to maintain any vehicle used in transportation for compensation in a safe operating condition or to comply with the Vehicle Code or with applicable regulations contained in Title 13 of the California Code of Regulations, if that failure is either a consistent failure or presents an imminent danger to public safety.

(B) Failure to enroll all drivers in the pull-notice system as required by Section 1808.1 of the Vehicle Code.

(C) Failure to submit any application or pay any fee required by subdivision (e) or (h) of Section 34501.12 of the Vehicle Code within the timeframes set forth in that section.

(2) The written recommendation shall specifically
 indicate compliance with subdivision (c).

(b) (1) A household mover whose permit is suspended pursuant to subdivision (a) may obtain a reinspection of its terminal and vehicles by the Department of the California Highway Patrol by submitting a written request for reinstatement to the bureau and paying a reinstatement fee of one hundred twenty-five dollars ($125).

(2) A household mover whose permit is
 suspended for failure to submit any application or to pay any fee required by Section 34501.12 of the Vehicle Code shall present proof of having submitted that application or having paid that fee to the Department of the California Highway Patrol before applying for reinstatement of that permit.

(3) The bureau shall deposit all reinstatement fees collected pursuant to this subdivision in the fund. The bureau shall then forward a request for reinspection to the Department of the California Highway Patrol which shall then perform a reinspection within a reasonable time or verify receipt of the application or fee, or both the application and fee. The bureau shall reinstate a household
 mover’s 
 permit that is suspended under subdivision (a) promptly upon receipt of a written recommendation from the Department of the California Highway Patrol that the household mover’s safety compliance has improved to the satisfaction of that department, or that the required application or fees have been received, unless the permit is suspended for another reason or has been revoked.

(c) Before transmitting a recommendation pursuant to subdivision (a) to the bureau, the Department of the California Highway Patrol shall notify the household
 mover in writing of all of the following:

(1) That the Department of the California Highway Patrol has determined that the household mover’s safety record, or compliance with Section 1808.1 of, or subdivision (e) or (h) of Section 34501.12 of, the Vehicle Code, is unsatisfactory, furnishing a copy of any documentation or summary of any other evidence supporting the determination.

(2) That the determination may result in a suspension or revocation of the
 household mover’s permit by the bureau.

(3) That the household mover may request a review of the determination by the Department of the California Highway Patrol within five days of its receipt of the notice required under this subdivision. If a review pursuant to this paragraph is requested by the household mover, the Department of the California Highway Patrol shall conduct and evaluate that review prior to transmitting any notification to the bureau
 pursuant to subdivision (a).

(d) If the bureau, after a hearing, finds that a household mover has continued to operate as a household mover after its permit or permits have been suspended pursuant to subdivision (a), the bureau shall do one of the following:

(1) Revoke the operating permit or permits of the
 household mover.

(2) Impose upon the holder of the permit or permits a fine of not less than one thousand dollars ($1,000) nor more than five
 thousand dollars ($5,000) for each day of unlawful operations.

(History: Added by Stats. 2017, Ch. 421, Sec. 8.   (SB 19)   Effective January 1, 2018.)
-------------------------------------------

19276.

After the cancellation or revocation of a permit or during the period of its suspension, it is unlawful for a household mover to conduct any operations as a household mover. The bureau may either grant or deny an application for a new permit whenever it appears that a prior permit of the applicant has been canceled or revoked pursuant to Section 19275, or whenever it
 appears, after a hearing, that as a prior permitholder, the applicant engaged in any of the unlawful activities set forth in Section 19275 for which its permit might have been canceled or revoked.

(History: Added by Stats. 2017, Ch. 421, Sec. 8.   (SB 19)   Effective January 1, 2018.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 8. Fines and Penalties [19277. - 19284.]

19277.

(a) Every household mover and every officer, director, agent, or employee of any household mover who violates or who fails to comply with, or who procures, aids, or abets any violation by any household
 mover of any provision of this chapter or any rule or regulation administered by the bureau pursuant to this chapter, or of any operating permit issued to any household mover, or who procures, aids, or abets any household mover in its failure to obey, observe, or comply with any such rule, regulation, or operating permit, is guilty of a misdemeanor, and is punishable by a fine of not more than two thousand five hundred dollars ($2,500) or by imprisonment in the county jail for not more
 than three months, or both. If a violation is willful, each willful violation is punishable by a fine of not more than ten thousand dollars ($10,000) or by imprisonment in the county jail for not more than one year, or both. If the violation involves operating or holding oneself out as a household mover without a permit, the fine shall be not less than one thousand dollars ($1,000).

(b) Any person who violates subdivision (a) of Section 19237, is guilty of a misdemeanor, and is punishable by a fine of not more than ten thousand dollars ($10,000), by imprisonment in the county jail for not more than one year, or both, for each violation.

(History: Added by Stats. 2017, Ch. 421, Sec. 8.   (SB 19)   Effective January 1, 2018.)
-------------------------------------------

19277.1.

Every household mover, and every officer, director, agent, or employee of a household mover, who displays on any vehicle any identifying symbol other than the symbol prescribed by the bureau pursuant to Section 19236 or who fails to remove an identifying symbol when required by the bureau, is guilty of a misdemeanor and is punishable by a fine of not more than one thousand
 dollars ($1,000), by imprisonment in the county jail for not more than one year, or both.

(History: Added by Stats. 2017, Ch. 421, Sec. 8.   (SB 19)   Effective January 1, 2018.)
-------------------------------------------

19278.

Every corporation or person other than a household mover, who knowingly and willfully, either individually, or acting as an officer, agent, or employee of a corporation, copartnership, or any other person other than a household mover, violates any provision of this chapter or fails to observe, obey, or comply with any rule, regulation, or requirement administered by
 the bureau pursuant to this chapter, or who procures, aids, or abets any household mover in its violation of this chapter, or in its failure to obey, observe, or comply with any such rule, regulation, or requirement, is guilty of a misdemeanor, and is punishable by a fine of not more than one thousand dollars ($1,000) or by imprisonment in the county jail for not more than three months, or both.

(History: Added by Stats. 2017, Ch. 421, Sec. 8.   (SB 19)   Effective January 1, 2018.)
-------------------------------------------

19279.

Except as otherwise provided in this chapter, every household mover and every officer, director, agent, or employee of any household mover who violates or who fails to comply with, or who procures, aids, or abets, any violation by any household
 mover of any provision of this chapter, or who fails to obey, observe, or comply with any rule, regulation, or requirement administered by the bureau pursuant to this chapter, or with any operating permit issued to any household mover, or who procures, aids, or abets any household mover in its failure to obey, observe, or comply with any such rule, regulation, requirement, or operating permit, is subject to a citation and fine of not more than five hundred dollars ($500) for each offense. This section
 does not prohibit the bureau from seeking to deny, suspend, revoke, or place on probation an operating permit, in lieu of issuing a citation and fine.

(History: Added by Stats. 2017, Ch. 421, Sec. 8.   (SB 19)   Effective January 1, 2018.)
-------------------------------------------

19279.1.

Whenever the bureau finds that any person or corporation is operating as a household mover without a valid permit, or is holding itself out as such a household mover without a valid permit in contravention of Section 19279.3, the bureau may issue a citation and fine of not more than five thousand dollars ($5,000) for each violation. The bureau may assess the person or corporation an
 amount sufficient to cover the reasonable expense of investigation incurred by the bureau.

(History: Added by Stats. 2017, Ch. 421, Sec. 8.   (SB 19)   Effective January 1, 2018.)
-------------------------------------------

19279.2.

Every corporation or person other than a household mover who knowingly and willfully, either individually, or acting as an officer, agent, or employee of a corporation, copartnership, or any other person other than a household mover, violates any provision of this chapter or fails to observe, obey, or comply with any order, decision, rule, regulation, direction,
 demand, or requirement administered by the bureau pursuant to this chapter, or who procures, aids, or abets any household mover in its violation of this chapter, or in its failure to obey, observe, or comply with any such order, decision, rule, regulation, direction, demand, or requirement, is subject to a citation and fine of not more than five hundred dollars ($500) for each offense.

(History: Added by Stats. 2017, Ch. 421, Sec. 8.   (SB 19)   Effective January 1, 2018.)
-------------------------------------------

19279.3.

Every corporation or person who knowingly and willfully issues, publishes, or affixes, or causes or permits the issuance, publishing, or affixing, of any oral or written advertisement, broadcast, or other holding out to the public, or any portion thereof, that the corporation or person is in operation as a household mover without having a valid permit issued under this chapter is guilty of a misdemeanor punishable by a fine of not more than two thousand five hundred dollars ($2,500).

(History: Added by Stats. 2017, Ch. 421, Sec. 8.   (SB 19)   Effective January 1, 2018.)
-------------------------------------------

19280.

Every household mover that falsifies permit status, membership in an association, or location is subject to a citation and fine of not more than two thousand five hundred dollars ($2,500) per day that the household mover is in violation of this section.

(History: Added by Stats. 2017, Ch. 421, Sec. 8.   (SB 19)   Effective January 1, 2018.)
-------------------------------------------

19281.

Every violation of the provisions of this chapter or of any order, decision, decree, rule, regulation, direction, demand, or requirement administered by the bureau pursuant to this chapter by any household mover, any corporation, or any person is a separate and distinct offense, and in case of a continuing violation, each day’s continuance thereof is a separate and distinct offense.

(History: Added by Stats. 2017, Ch. 421, Sec. 8.   (SB 19)   Effective January 1, 2018.)
-------------------------------------------

19282.

All remedies and penalties accruing under this chapter are cumulative to each other and to the remedies and penalties available under any other law, and a suit for the recovery of one remedy or penalty does not bar or affect the recovery of any other remedy, penalty, or forfeiture or bar any criminal prosecution against any person or corporation, or any officer, director, agent, or employee thereof, or any other corporation or person.

(History: Added by Stats. 2017, Ch. 421, Sec. 8.   (SB 19)   Effective January 1, 2018.)
-------------------------------------------

19283.

Fines not paid to the bureau within the specified time period for a violation of this chapter or any order, decision, rule, regulation, direction, demand, tariff, or requirement administered by the bureau pursuant to this chapter shall be cause to deny the renewal of a permit or to suspend, revoke, or place it on probation.

(History: Added by Stats. 2017, Ch. 421, Sec. 8.   (SB 19)   Effective January 1, 2018.)
-------------------------------------------

19283.1.

(a) The bureau shall ensure that this chapter is enforced and obeyed, and that violations thereof are promptly prosecuted and that moneys due to the state are recovered and collected.

(b) For purposes of this section, “peace officer” means a person designated as a peace officer pursuant to Chapter 4.5 (commencing with Section 830) of Title 3 of Part 2 of the Penal Code.

(c) A peace officer may enforce and assist in the enforcement of Sections 19277 and 19278, resulting from a violation of Section 19236, 19237, 19244, or 19276, or more than one of those sections. A peace officer may additionally enforce and assist in the enforcement of Sections 19277.1 and 19279.3. In any case in which an arrest
 authorized by this subdivision is made for an offense declared to be a misdemeanor, and the person arrested does not demand to be taken before a magistrate, the arresting peace officer may, instead of taking the person before a magistrate, follow the procedure prescribed by Chapter 5C (commencing with Section 853.5) of Title 3 of Part 2 of the Penal Code. The provisions of that chapter shall thereafter apply with reference to any proceeding based upon the issuance of a citation pursuant to this authority.

(d) The bureau shall coordinate enforcement of this section with those peace officers likely to be involved in enforcing this section, including undertaking both of the following:

(1) Educational outreach to promote awareness among those peace officers about the requirements of Sections 19236, 19237, 19244, 19276, 19277, 19277.1, 19278, and 19279.3.

(2) Establishing lines of communication so that the bureau is notified if an action is commenced to enforce the requirements of those sections specified in subdivision (c), so that the bureau may take appropriate action to enforce the citation and fine provisions of this article.

(e) The Attorney General, a district attorney of the proper county or city and county, or a city attorney may institute and prosecute actions or proceedings for the violation of any law committed in connection with, or arising from, a transaction involving the transportation of household goods and personal effects.

(f) Notwithstanding any other law, a person employed as a special investigator or supervising special investigator by the bureau and designated by the director shall have the authority to issue a written notice to appear in court
 pursuant to Chapter 5C (commencing with Section 853.5) of Title 3 of Part 2 of the Penal Code for a violation of a provision for which a peace officer may enforce or assist in the enforcement pursuant to subdivision (c). An employee so designated is not a peace officer, is not entitled to safety member retirement benefits as a result of the designation, and does not have the power of arrest.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2019, Ch. 210, Sec. 1.   (SB 391)   Effective January 1, 2020.)
-------------------------------------------

19283.2.

All fines recovered by the bureau pursuant to this chapter, together with the costs thereof, shall be paid into the fund.

(History: Added by Stats. 2017, Ch. 421, Sec. 8.   (SB 19)   Effective January 1, 2018.)
-------------------------------------------

19284.

(a) Whenever a written notice to appear has been mailed to the owner of a household mover motor vehicle, an exact and legible duplicate copy of the notice, when filed with the magistrate in lieu of a verified complaint, is a complaint to which the defendant may plead guilty.

(b) If, however, the defendant fails to appear, does not deposit bail, or pleads other than guilty to the offense charged, a complaint shall be filed that conforms to Chapter 2 (commencing with Section 948) of
 Title 5 of Part 2 of the Penal Code and which shall be deemed to be an original complaint, and thereafter the proceeding shall be held as provided by law, except that the defendant may, by an agreement in writing, subscribed by the defendant and filed with the court, waive the filing of a verified complaint and elect that the prosecution may proceed upon a written notice to appear.

(History: Added by Stats. 2017, Ch. 421, Sec. 8.   (SB 19)   Effective January 1, 2018.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 9. Household Movers Uniform Business Permit Fee Act [19285. - 19293.]

19285.

This article may be cited as the Household Movers Uniform Business Permit Fee Act.

(History: Added by Stats. 2017, Ch. 421, Sec. 8.   (SB 19)   Effective January 1, 2018.)
-------------------------------------------

19286.

An adequate transportation system is essential to the welfare of the state, and an important part of that system is service rendered by household movers.

(History: Added by Stats. 2017, Ch. 421, Sec. 8.   (SB 19)   Effective January 1, 2018.)
-------------------------------------------

19287.

On and after the effective date of this article, a city, county, or a city and county shall not assess, levy, or collect an excise or license fee or tax of any kind, character, or description whatever upon the intercity transportation business conducted on or after the effective date of this article, by any household movers, or person or corporation, owning or operating motor vehicles in the transportation of property for hire upon the public highways, under the
 jurisdiction of the bureau. For purposes of this article, intercity transportation business includes every service performed in the connection with transportation of property by transportation companies where both the origin point and the destination point of the transported property are not within the exterior boundaries of a single city or city and county.

(History: Added by Stats. 2017, Ch. 421, Sec. 8.   (SB 19)   Effective January 1, 2018.)
-------------------------------------------

19288.

(a) On and after the effective date of this article, there is imposed upon every household mover, and every person or corporation, owning or operating motor vehicles in the transportation of property for hire upon the public highways, under the jurisdiction of the bureau, a permit fee that shall be paid to the
 bureau.

(b) (1) On or before January 1, 2023, the bureau shall engage in
 public workshops and a formal rulemaking pursuant to Chapter 3.5 (commencing with Section 11340) of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code, for the purpose of adopting and implementing a fee schedule that may increase or decrease the fees set forth in this chapter, or may impose alternate fees from the fees set forth in this chapter, provided that any alternate fees shall not exceed the reasonable costs of regulation for purposes of this chapter. The fees adopted by the bureau may include application fees, permit fees, reinstatement fees, delinquency fees, transfer fees, and other fees, as determined by the bureau. The fees adopted by the bureau pursuant to this paragraph shall supersede the fees otherwise set forth in this chapter, and upon the adoption of fees by the bureau pursuant to this paragraph, the fees prescribed in this chapter shall have no effect.

(2) Until the adoption of fees by the bureau
 pursuant to paragraph (1), every household mover, and every person or corporation, owning or operating motor vehicles in the transportation of property for hire upon the public highways, under the jurisdiction of the bureau, shall pay to the bureau a permit fee equal to one-tenth of 1 percent of gross operating revenue, which shall be payable to the bureau in the manner and at the times provided for the payment of the fee provided in Section 5003.1 of the Public Utilities Code. For purposes of this paragraph, “gross operating revenue” shall be the gross operating revenue defined in Section 5002 of the Public Utilities Code. It is the intent of the Legislature that the fee imposed by this paragraph will be equivalent to the fee imposed pursuant to Section 5328 of the Public Utilities Code as of June 30, 2018. 

(c) The fees imposed by this section are in lieu of all city, county, or
 city and county excise or license
 fees or
 taxes of any kind, character, or description whatever, upon the intercity transportation business of any household
 mover, and every person or corporation owning or operating motor vehicles in the transportation of property for hire upon the public highways, under the jurisdiction of the bureau.

(d) This section does not prohibit the imposition by a city, county, or city and county, of any excise or license tax authorized under Division 2 (commencing with Section 6001) of the Revenue and Taxation Code.

(e) The Public Utilities Commission shall enter into a no-cost memorandum of understanding with the department for the purpose of providing the department with access to the Public Utilities Commission’s database relating to household goods carriers. The Public Utilities Commission shall supply the department with